Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4999.
people of the state of michigan enact: CHAPTER 8H Sec. 90nn. (1) The Michigan nonprofit development fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received from appropriations or from any other source in the ND fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the ND fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the ND fund. (3) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, money in the ND fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the ND fund and does not lapse to the general fund. Money in the ND fund in excess of $5,000,000.00 at the close of the fiscal year must be deposited in the general fund. (4) The fund is the administrator of the ND fund for audits of the ND fund. (5) The fund shall expend money from the ND fund, on appropriation, only for 1 or more of the following purposes: (a) To award grants to 1 or more statewide nonprofit membership organizations to provide nonprofit assistance and services. (b) To provide nonprofit, interest-free, micro bridge loans. (c) To cover administrative costs up to 10% of the annual appropriation. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01718'25) or House Bill No. 4998 (request no. H01718'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.